New Jersey, session 221, S2983.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Whenever the department acquires lands for recreation and conservation purposes for each acquisition that contains 25 acres or more of forested area using, in whole or in part, constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys, constitutionally dedicated moneys pursuant to P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or Green Acres bond act moneys, the department shall prepare and implement a forest stewardship plan for those lands within two years after the date of acquisition. b.    A forest stewardship plan prepared and implemented pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall conform with the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36) designed to ensure the sustainability of forest lands. 2.    a.  Within five years after the date of enactment of this act, the department shall prepare and implement a forest stewardship plan for all lands owned in fee simple by the State for recreation and conservation purposes that contain 25 acres or more of forested area on the date of enactment of this act. b.    A forest stewardship plan prepared and implemented pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall, at a minimum, conform with the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36) designed to ensure the sustainability of forest lands. 3.    a.  Whenever a local government unit or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization acquires lands for recreation and conservation purposes for each acquisition that contains 25 acres or more of forested area using, in whole or in part, constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys, constitutionally dedicated moneys pursuant to P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or Green Acres bond act moneys, the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, as applicable, shall prepare and implement a forest stewardship plan for those lands within two years after the date of acquisition. b.    (1)  The forest stewardship plan shall be submitted to the department for review and approval, and the department shall approve, approve with changes, or disapprove the plan within 30 days after receipt thereof.  If the department disapproves a plan, the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, as applicable, shall work with the department to develop a mutually acceptable plan. (2) Upon request of the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, the department shall provide technical assistance in the preparation of the forest stewardship plan. c.     A forest stewardship plan prepared and implemented pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall, at a minimum, conform with the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36) designed to ensure the sustainability of forest lands. 4.    In prioritizing applications submitted by local government units or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations for funding for the acquisition or development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes, the department shall accord a higher weight to any application submitted by a local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, as applicable, that implements a forest stewardship plan on lands owned for recreation and conservation purposes by that local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, as applicable, for which a forest stewardship plan is not required pursuant to section 3 of this act.  This additional weight shall be in addition to any other criteria and ranking procedures established by the department pursuant to P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) and P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.